Utah statutes.
19-6-607.   Penalty.

(1)  A violation of this part is a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  Each lead acid battery improperly disposed of or rejected by a lead acid battery wholesaler or retailer in violation of Section 19-6-603, 19-6-604, or 19-6-605 is a separate violation.

